Utah statutes.
48-2a-607.   Limitations on distributions.

A partner may not receive a distribution from a limited partnership to the extent that, after giving effect to the distribution, all liabilities of the limited partnership, other than liabilities to partners on account of their partnership interests, exceed the fair value of the partnership assets.



Enacted by Chapter 233, 1990 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

